morph-phon.xfst
! morph-phon.xfst
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!


#include "options.h"

!
! This file only contains a set of useful definitions. This is sourced
! from the other scripts that generate useful automata.
!

!
! Define some useful character classes
!

! Vowels
define Vf   e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î | %^sFRV | %^sFUV;
define Vb   a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û | %^sBRV | %^sBUV;
define Vh   i | ü | ı | u | İ | Ü | I | U | î | Î | û | Û | %^si | %^sü | %^sı | %^su;
define Vl   e | ö | a | o | E | Ö | A | O | â | Â | %^se | %^sö | %^sa | %^so;
define Vfr  ö | ü | Ö | Ü | %^sFRV;
define Vfu  e | i | E | İ | î | Î | %^sFUV;
define Vbr  o | u | O | U | û | Û | %^sBRV;
define Vbu  a | ı | A | I | â | Â | %^sBUV;
define Vowel  Vf | Vb;
define Vbuf %^%(I%) | %^%(A%);
define Vpal %^pA | %^pI | %^pO | %^pU | %^pÂ | %^pÎ | %^pÔ |%^pÛ;
define Vxx  %^A | %^I ;
define Vsilent %^sFRV | %^sFUV | %^sBRV | %^sBUV ; 
define Vall Vowel | Vxx | Vpal | Vsilent; ! except buffer vowels
define Vsurface   e | i | ö | ü | E | İ | Ö | Ü | î | Î |
                  a | ı | o | u | A | I | O | U | â | Â | û | Û ;

! Consonants
define ConsV b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
           B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y | %^sVC;
define ConsUV p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
            P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H | %^sUC;
define Cons  ConsV | ConsUV;
define ConsBuf %^%(y%) | %^%(s%) | %^%(ş%) | %^%(n%);
define ConsXX    %^c | %^p | %^t | %^k | %^g | %^K | %^D | %^C | %@LN ;
define ConsSilent %^sVC |  %^sUC;
define ConsAll  Cons | ConsXX |ConsSilent; ! except buffers
define ConsSurface b | d | c | g | v | z | j | f | ğ | l | m | n | r | w | y | 
                   B | D | C | G | V | Z | J | F | Ğ | L | M | N | R | W | Y |
                   p | t | ç | k | f | s | ş | h | 
                   P | T | Ç | K | F | S | Ş | H ;

define SilentLetter Vsilent | ConsSilent;
define SurfaceLetter ConsSurface | Vsurface;

! Intermediate symbols with no surface forms
define Boundary %@MB | %@RB | %@dB ;
define IntSym   Boundary | %@M | %@MREDUP | %@NCOMP | %@opt3 | %@APOS | %^NS | %^NNS;

define Digit %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9;

!
! Delete the stress-related intermediate symbols
!

define delStressMarks    ["^NS"|"^NNS"|ˈ] -> 0;


!
! Abbreviation handling
!
! The first rule adds the default silent front/unronded vowel 
! to abbreviation which does not have any vowel, or any silent 
! letters added in the lexicon.
!
! The second rule inserts an optional dot `.' if there isn't one
! already.
!

define Abbr     [..] -> %^sFUV    || .#. ConsSurface+ _ %@ABBR
            .o. [..] (->) %.      || \%. _ %@ABBR
            .o. %@ABBR -> 0;

!
! Delete apostrophe  if it is followed by null morphemes
! Replace it with acceptable symbols 
! 
! NOTE: for generation it is better to limit these to only one.
!
define AposSym APOSTROPHE_SYMS ;

define replaceApos %@APOS -> 0 || _ Boundary+ .#.
               .o. %@APOS -> AposSym;

!
! The same as above, but also allow forms with no apostrophe
! This is currently not used, in favor of options in 'options.h'.
!
define replaceAposOpt %@APOS -> 0 || _ Boundary+ .#.
                      .o. %@APOS (->) 0
                      .o. %@APOS -> AposSym;

!
! Replace @dB `digit boundary' with space or nothing
!
! we allow insertion of space anywhere, or lack of it between the
! `digits'.
!

define NumberSpace      %@dB  -> 0    || _ %@RB
                    .o. %@dB (->) " "
                    .o. %@dB  -> 0;

!
! Numeric (silent) phonemes
!
!
! We add `silent' phonemes to the end of the numeric forms so that
! they inflect correctly with regard to vowel harmony, buffer deletion
! and voicing assimilation.
!

define NumericInsSilentP [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || %0^{12,14} ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || %0^{9,11}  ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || %0^{6,8}   ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || %0^{3,5}   ./. %@tSep  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sVC || Digit %0^2      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || \Digit %0^2     _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || [1|3] %0  _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 2 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || 4 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 5 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || 6 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || 7 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 8 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || 9 %0      _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || %0        _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 1         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [2|½]     _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sUC || [3|4|¼|¾] _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || 5         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBUV       || 6         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || 7         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || 8         _ %@RB
                     .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || 9         _ %@RB 
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i][v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ]      _ %@RomNum ! 4
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ]               _ %@RomNum ! 5
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV       || [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ][Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]      _ %@RomNum ! 6
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ][Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]^{2}  _ %@RomNum ! 7
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ][Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]^{3}  _ %@RomNum ! 8
    .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sUC || [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]^{3,4}         _ %@RomNum ! 3,4
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]^{2}           _ %@RomNum ! 2
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i]               _ %@RomNum ! 1
    .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i][X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]      _ %@RomNum ! 9
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ][L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ]      _ %@RomNum ! 40
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ]               _ %@RomNum ! 50
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sUC || [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ][X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]      _ %@RomNum ! 60
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sUC || [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ][X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]^{2}  _ %@RomNum ! 70
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ][X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]^{3}  _ %@RomNum ! 80
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]^{2}           _ %@RomNum ! 20
    .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ]^{3}           _ %@RomNum ! 30
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV %^sVC || [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ][C|Ⅽ|c|ⅽ]      _ %@RomNum ! 90
    .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sVC || [C|Ⅽ|c|ⅽ]               _ %@RomNum ! 100
    .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sVC || [D|Ⅾ|d|ⅾ]               _ %@RomNum ! 500
    .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sVC || [C|Ⅽ|c|ⅽ][M|Ⅿ|m|ⅿ]      _ %@RomNum ! 900
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [M|Ⅿ|m|ⅿ]               _ %@RomNum ! 1000
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV       || [Ⅱ|ⅱ|Ⅶ|ⅶ|Ⅻ|ⅻ]           _ %@RomNum ! 2,7,12
    .o. [..] -> %^sFRV %^sUC || [Ⅲ|ⅲ|Ⅳ|ⅳ]               _ %@RomNum ! 3,4
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV       || [Ⅵ|ⅵ]                   _ %@RomNum ! 6
    .o. [..] -> %^sBUV       || [Ⅵ|ⅵ]                   _ %@RomNum ! 6
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [Ⅷ|ⅷ]                   _ %@RomNum ! 8
    .o. [..] -> %^sBRV %^sVC || [Ⅸ|ⅸ]                   _ %@RomNum ! 9
    .o. [..] -> %^sFUV %^sVC || [Ⅺ|ⅺ]                   _ %@RomNum ! 11
    .o. %@RomNum -> 0 ;

!
! Numeric separator
!
! The behaviour of the following is defined in options.h
!

define NumericSeparator     %@tSep -> THOUSAND_SEPARATOR   
                        .o. %@dSep -> DECIMAL_SEPARATOR ;

!
! This part deals with the intermediate symbol @NCOMP inserted 
! in surface forms. In particular, if @NCOMP is followed by plural
! suffix lAr, it is moved after the plural suffix, if it is followed
! by the composite suffix lArI, it is deleted. The other cases where
! (s)I is deleted handled separately below.
!
! TODO: there is some double work done in parts of this rule

define CompNoun [ %^%(s%) %^I -> 0 || _ %@NCOMP Boundary l (IntSym) %^A r ]
           .o.  [ l %^A r -> l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) %^I 
                || %@NCOMP Boundary _ %@MB ]
           .o.  [ %^%(s%) %^I %@MB l %^A r -> l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) %^I 
                || (%@NCOMP) Boundary (AposSym) _ %@MB ]
           .o.  [ %@NCOMP -> 0 ];

!
! (s)I deletion
!
!
! The morpheme (s)I is deleted in some contexts. What is deleted is 
! not clear, but we model such that (s)I gets deleted 
! - before another (s)I
! - before lArI
! - after lI, lIk, sIz, CI
! - after  -(y)AsI
! - and optionally after aynı and before a case suffix 
! 
! TODO/CHECK: It seems not to be deleted afater -lIk in some cases. 
!  `ev hayvanılık??'
!

define DeleteSI  %^%(s%) %^I -> 0 ||     _ Boundary+ %^%(s%) %^I Boundary,
                                         _ Boundary+ l %^A r %^I Boundary,
                                         _ Boundary+ [ l %^I | 
                                                       l %^I k | 
                                                       s %^I z | 
                                                       %^C %^I ],
                                     %^%(y%) %^A s %^I Boundary+ _ %Boundary,
                                     %^%(s%) %^I %@RB AposSym _ %@MB
         .o.     %^%(s%) %^I (->) 0 ||
                           .#. {aynı} %@RB _ %@MB [ %^%(y%) %^A
                                                   |%^%(y%) %^I
                                                   |%^%(n%) %^I n
                                                   |%^D %^A
                                                   |%^D %^A n
                                                   |%^%(y%) l %^A ];
!
! lAr deletion
!
!
! If there are multiple morphemes in a sequence with surface 
! form lAr or lArI following each other, only one survives on the surface.
!

define DeleteLAR  l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary _ Boundary+ l %^A r 
              .o. l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary l %^A r (%^I) Boundary+ _ 
              .o. l %^A r -> 0 || Boundary l %^A r %@MB %^%(s%) (%^I) %@MB+ _ ;


!
! `n' deletion in derivation -InC
! this happesn after the stems einding with `n'
!

define DeleteN  %^%(I%) n %^c  -> %^c || n Boundary+ _ %@MB ;

!
! `n' insertion after (s) / larI (y) -> (n)
!
! After (s)I and larI -DA -DAn become -nDA -nDAn, (y)A becomes nA
! Last line is about -(s)I deleted after root 'aynı"

define InsertN  %^D %^A   -> n %^D %^A,
                %^D %^A n -> n %^D %^A n,
                %^%(y%) %^A  -> n %^A,
                %^%(y%) %^I -> n %^I ,
                %^C %^A  -> n %^C %^A
                || Boundary [ [%^%(s%)|s] %^I 
                    | Boundary [ l %^A r %^I | k i | k ü]
                   ] [Boundary|AposSym]+ _ %@MB,
                   .#. {aynı} %@RB %@MB _;
